Maine, session 132, LD711.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2021, c. 659, §17, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
An entity proposing the development of a distributed generation resource that does not
meet one or more of the requirements of this subsection may petition the commission for a
good-cause exemption due to external delays outside of the entity's control, which the
commission may grant if it finds that, without the external delays, the entity could
reasonably have been expected to meet the requirements. The commission shall find that
delays related to site inspections and local government approvals for a distributed
generation resource constructed on nonfertile land are external delays outside of the entity's
control. The commission shall adopt rules to establish a process by which an entity
proposing the development of a distributed generation resource on nonfertile land may
appeal a denial of a good-cause exemption. The process must allow an entity proposing the
development of the distributed generation resource to provide documentation regarding the
reasons for the delay. For the purposes of this subsection, "nonfertile land" means land that
cannot be used for or is not capable of use without substantial modification for production
of agriculturally related products, including, but not limited to, crops, livestock, poultry,
dairy products and sod. In adopting rules required by this subsection, the commission may
consult with the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry.